Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.314

Rules development agenda.

Each state agency shall prepare a semiannual agenda for rules under development. The agency shall file the agenda with the code reviser for publication in the state register not later than January 31st and July 31st of each year. Not later than three days after its publication in the state register, the agency shall send a copy of the agenda to each person who has requested receipt of a copy of the agenda. The agency shall also submit the agenda to the director of financial management, the rules review committee, and any other state agency that may reasonably be expected to have an interest in the subject of rules that will be developed.

[ 1997 c 409 s 206.]

NOTES:

Part headings—Severability—1997 c 409: See notes following RCW 43.22.051.